Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 19
SAVINGS AND LOAN ASSOCIATIONS — OPERATION

Sec.

§ 26-1901. Operating contracts to be approved by director. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1902. Office to be separate from bank premises. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1903 — 26-1912. Advertising — Promotions — Premiums — Now accounts — Savings accounts. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1913. Accounts in two or more names. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1914. Joint accounts by husband and wife. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1915, 26-1916. Pledge to association of savings accounts in joint tenancy — Accounts of administrators, executors, guardians, custodians, trustees and other fiduciaries. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1917. Trust accounts where trust instrument not disclosed. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1918 — 26-1920. Powers of attorney on savings accounts — Savings accounts as legal investments — Withdrawals. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1921. Redemption. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1922. Lien on savings accounts. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1923. Interest on deposits. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1924, 26-1925. Method of paying interest on deposits — Computation of net income. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1926. Allocation to net worth. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1927 — 26-1935. Dividends on capital stock — Use of undivided profits and expense fund contributions —Investment in securities — Loans, real estate loan plans and other investments — Loan expenses — Dealing with successors in interest — Enlargement of powers — Restrictions on lending transactions. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1936. Restrictions on terms. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1937 — 26-1942. Restrictions on percentage of appraisal — Real estate loans on unimproved land — Participation in real estate loans — Sale and servicing of real estate loans — Valuation of real property on the books of an association — Revaluation of real property by director. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1943. Capital stock and reserve requirements. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1944, 26-1945. Liquidity requirements — Borrowings. [Repealed.]

§ 26-1946. Association as trustee. [Repealed.]